Washington statutes.
RCW 11.107.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Ascertainable standard" means a standard relating to an individual's health, education, support, or maintenance within the meaning of Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 2041(b)(1)(A) or 2514(c)(1) of the federal internal revenue code and any applicable regulations, as amended, as of July 23, 2017.

(2) "Charitable interest" means an interest in a trust that:

(a) Is held by a charitable organization;

(b) Benefits charitable organizations;

(c) Is held for charitable purposes; or

(d) Holds assets subject to limitations permitting their use only for charitable, religious, eleemosynary, benevolent, educational, or similar purposes.

(3) "Charitable purpose" means a purpose that is for: The relief of poverty, the advancement of education or religion, the promotion of health, governmental or municipal purposes, or other purposes the achievement of which are beneficial to a community.

(4) "Decanting power" or "the decanting power" means the power of a trustee under this chapter to distribute income and principal of a first trust to one or more second trusts or to modify the terms of the first trust.

(5) "Expanded discretion" means a discretionary power of distribution that is not limited to an ascertainable standard or a reasonably definite standard.

(6) "First trust" means a trust over which a trustee may exercise the decanting power.

(7) "Limited discretion" means a discretionary power of distribution that is limited to an ascertainable standard or a reasonably definite standard.

(8) "Person" means an individual, estate, business or nonprofit entity, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or other legal entity.

(9) "Qualified beneficiary" means a beneficiary that on the date of qualification is described in RCW 11.98.002(2).

(10) "Reasonably definite standard" means a clearly measurable standard under which a holder of a power of distribution is legally accountable within the meaning of Title 26 U.S.C. Sec. 674(b)(5)(A) of the federal internal revenue code and any applicable regulations, as amended, as of July 23, 2017.

(11) "Second trust" means:

(a) A first trust after modification under this chapter; or

(b) A trust to which a distribution of income and principal from a first trust is or may be made under this chapter.

[ 2017 c 29 s 1.]